District of Columbia statutes.
22-3309

Destroying boundary markers.

Whoever maliciously cuts down, destroys, or removes any boundary tree, stone, or other mark or monument, or maliciously effaces any inscription thereon, either of his or her own lands or of the lands of any other person whatsoever, even though such boundary or bounded trees should stand within the person’s own land so cutting down and destroying the same, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 and imprisoned not exceeding 180 days.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1333, ch. 854, § 880
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(u), 41 DCR 1639
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(q), 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(w), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-3109.
1973 Ed., § 22-3109.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000”.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(q) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(w) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.